Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Chapter 1. Definitions and General Provisions.
§ 4.1-114.
Annual review of operations of certain mixed beverage licensees.

The Board shall at least annually review the operations of each establishment holding a mixed beverage restaurant license and each person holding a caterer’s license to determine whether during the preceding license year such licensee has met the food-beverage ratio required by §

4.1-206.3

. If not met, the license granted to such licensee may be suspended or revoked. If the license is revoked, no new license may be granted to the licensee with respect to such establishment or catering business for at least one year from the date of the revocation. For the purposes of this section and §

4.1-206.3

, “nonalcoholic beverage” shall not include any beverages, ice, water or other mixer served with an alcoholic beverage.

History.

1968, c. 7, § 4-98.7; 1980, c. 490; 1981, c. 565; 1986, c. 374; 1990, c. 402; 1993, c. 866; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 8, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That on or after July 1, 2020, the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may issue mixed beverage carrier licenses to persons operating a common carrier of passengers by bus, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages anywhere in the Commonwealth to passengers while in transit aboard any such common carrier. The state license fee for any such license granted prior to January 1, 2022, shall be $190. Such license shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license. For the purposes of this enactment, ‘bus’ means a motor vehicle that (i) is operated by a common carrier licensed under Chapter 20 ( §

46.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 46.2 of the Code of Virginia to transport passengers for compensation over the highways of the Commonwealth on regular or irregular routes of not less than 100 miles, (ii) seats no more than 24 passengers, (iii) is 40 feet in length or longer, (iv) offers wireless Internet services, (v) is equipped with charging stations at every seat for cellular phones or other portable devices, and (vi) during the transportation of passengers, is staffed by an attendant who has satisfied all training requirements set forth in Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia or Board regulation.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and substituted “§

4.1-206.3

” for “§

4.1-210

” twice.

§ 4.1-115.
Reports and accounting systems of Board; auditing books and records.

The Board shall make reports to the Governor as he may require covering the administration and enforcement of this subtitle. Additionally, the Board shall submit an annual report to the Governor and General Assembly on or before December 15 each year, which shall contain:

A statement of the nature and amount of the business transacted by each government store during the year;

A statement of the assets and liabilities of the Board, including a statement of income and expenses and such other financial statements and matters as may be necessary to show the result of the operations of the Board for the year;

A statement showing the taxes collected under this subtitle during the year;

General information and remarks about the working of the alcoholic beverage control laws within the Commonwealth; and

Any other information requested by the Governor.

The Board shall maintain an accounting system in compliance with generally accepted accounting principles and approved in accordance with §

2.2-803

.

A regular postaudit shall be conducted of all accounts and transactions of the Board. An annual audit of a fiscal and compliance nature of the accounts and transactions of the Board shall be conducted by the Auditor of Public Accounts on or before October 1. The cost of the annual audit and postaudit examinations shall be borne by the Board. The Board may order such other audits as it deems necessary.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-13; 1984, c. 734; 1993, c. 866; 2004, c. 650; 2005, c. 633.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 650 deleted subsection C, which formerly read: “The annual report shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of § 2.2-1127”; and redesignated former subsection D as present subsection C.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 633 substituted “December 15” for “October 1 of” in subsection A.

§ 4.1-116.
Disposition of moneys collected by Board; creation of Enterprise Fund; reserve fund.

All moneys collected by the Board shall be paid directly and promptly into the state treasury, or shall be deposited to the credit of the State Treasurer in a state depository, without any deductions on account of salaries, fees, costs, charges, expenses, refunds or claims of any description whatever, as required by §

2.2-1802

.All moneys so paid into the state treasury, less the net profits determined pursuant to subsection C, shall be set aside as and constitute an Enterprise Fund, subject to appropriation, for the payment of (i) the salaries and remuneration of the members, agents, and employees of the Board and (ii) all costs and expenses incurred in establishing and maintaining government stores and in the administration of the provisions of this subtitle, including the purchasing, building, leasing and operation of distilleries and the manufacture of alcoholic beverages.

The net profits derived under the provisions of this subtitle shall be transferred by the Comptroller to the general fund of the state treasury quarterly, within fifty days after the close of each quarter or as otherwise provided in the appropriation act. As allowed by the Governor, the Board may deduct from the net profits quarterly a sum for the creation of a reserve fund not exceeding the sum of $2.5 million in connection with the administration of this subtitle and to provide for the depreciation on the buildings, plants and equipment owned, held or operated by the Board.

The term “net profits” as used in this section means the total of all moneys collected by the Board less all costs, expenses and charges authorized by this section.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 4-22, 4-23; 1960, c. 104; 1962, c. 385; 1964, c. 215; 1966, c. 431; 1968, c. 623; 1970, c. 727; 1972, cc. 138, 849; 1973, c. 349; 1974, c. 460; 1981, c. 514; 1982, c. 540; 1983, c. 427; 1984, c. 105; 1985, c. 222; 1993, c. 866.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item § 3-1.01 A 2 b, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §

4.1-116

B, Code of Virginia, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority shall properly record the depreciation of all depreciable assets, including approved projects, property, plant and equipment. The State Comptroller shall be notified of the amount of depreciation costs recorded by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority. However, such depreciation costs shall not be the basis for reducing the quarterly transfers needed to meet the estimated profits contained in this act.”

§ 4.1-117.
Disposition of net profits to localities.

When the moneys transferred quarterly or as otherwise provided in the appropriation act by the Comptroller to the general fund of the state treasury exceed the sum of $187,500, two-thirds of all moneys in excess of $187,500 shall be apportioned by the Comptroller and distributed quarterly within ten days following such transfer.
Such payments shall be made by the Comptroller drawn on the Treasurer of Virginia to the several counties, cities, and towns of the Commonwealth, appropriated on the basis of the population of the respective counties, cities, and towns, according to the last preceding United States census.
However, in the case of any town which came into existence in or about the year 1691 which is now the county seat of any county having a population of less than 45,000 but more than 40,000, and the boundaries of such town are not fixed, such portion of the moneys appropriated shall be based on an estimate of the population of such town made by the Center for Public Service. The judge of the circuit court of the county in which the town or city or greater part thereof seeking an increase under the provisions of this chapter is located may appoint two disinterested persons as commissioners, neither of whom shall reside in the county, city, or town which is the subject of the annexation proceedings.
The commissioners so appointed shall determine the population of the territory annexed to the town or city as of the date of the last preceding United States census and report their findings to the court, and future distributions of the moneys allocated under the provisions of this chapter shall be made in accordance therewith.
The Comptroller shall make no adjustments in his distribution of profits until the Secretary of the Commonwealth transmits to the Comptroller, pursuant to §

15.2-3209

, a copy of the court order granting the petition of annexation.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-22; 1960, c. 104; 1962, c. 385; 1964, c. 215; 1966, c. 431; 1968, c. 623; 1970, c. 727; 1972, c. 849; 1973, c. 349; 1974, c. 460; 1981, c. 514; 1982, c. 540; 1983, c. 427; 1984, c. 105; 1985, c. 222; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

As to failure of county or city to comply with law on general reassessment of real estate, see §

58.1-3259

.

§ 4.1-118.
Certain information not to be made public.

Neither the Board nor its employees shall divulge any information regarding (i) financial reports or records required pursuant to §

4.1-114

; (ii) the purchase orders and invoices for beer and wine filed with the Board by wholesale beer and wine licensees; or (iii) beer and wine taxes collected from, refunded to, or adjusted for any person. The provisions of §

58.1-3

shall apply, mutatis mutandis, to beer and wine taxes collected pursuant to this subtitle and to purchase orders and invoices for beer and wine filed with the Board by wholesale beer and wine licensees.

Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit the use or release of such information or documents by the Board to any governmental or law-enforcement agency, or when considering the granting, denial, revocation, or suspension of a license or permit, or the assessment of any penalty against a licensee or permittee.

Nor shall this section prohibit the Board or its employees from compiling and disseminating to any member of the public aggregate statistical information pertaining to (i) malt beverage excise tax collection as long as such information does not reveal or disclose excise tax collection from any identified licensee; (ii) the total quantities of wine sold or shipped into the Commonwealth by each out-of-state winery, distributor, or importer for resale in the Commonwealth by wholesale wine licensees collectively; (iii) the total amount of wine sales in the Commonwealth by wholesale wine licensees collectively; or (iv) the total amount of purchases or sales submitted by licensees as required pursuant to §

4.1-114

, provided such information does not identify the licensee.

History.

1988, c. 261, § 4-145; 1993, c. 866; 1994, c. 179.

§ 4.1-119.
(Effective until July 1, 2024) Operation of government stores.

Subject to the provisions of §§

4.1-121

and

4.1-122

, the Board may establish, maintain, and operate government stores for the sale of spirits, nonalcoholic spirit alternatives, wine produced by farm wineries, low alcohol beverage coolers produced by licensed distillers, vermouth, mixers, products used in connection with distilled spirits, including any garnish or garnishment applied to the rim of a glass of distilled spirits, as may be approved by the Board from time to time, and products licensed by the Virginia Tourism Corporation as specified in §

4.1-103

in such counties, cities, and towns considered advisable by the Board. The Board may discontinue any such store.

With respect to the sale of wine or cider produced by farm wineries, the Board may give preference to farm wineries that produce 2,500 cases or less of wine or cider per year.

The Board shall fix the wholesale and retail prices at which the various classes, varieties and brands of alcoholic beverages and other Board-approved products that are sold in government stores. Differences in the cost of operating stores, and market competition and conditions may be reflected in the sale price of alcoholic beverages sold at government stores. The Board may sell alcoholic beverages to federal instrumentalities (i) authorized and operating under the laws of the United States and regulations of the United States Department of Defense and (ii) located within the boundaries of federal enclaves or reservations over which the United States has acquired jurisdiction, at prices which may be greater or less than the wholesale price charged other authorized purchasers. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the authority of the Board to fix the retail price of alcoholic beverages sold at government stores, which retail price may include promotional, volume, or other discounts deemed appropriate by the Board.

Alcoholic beverages at government stores shall be sold by employees of the Authority who shall carry out the provisions of this subtitle and Board regulations governing the operation of government stores and the sale of alcoholic beverages, except that the Board may appoint the holder of a distiller’s license or its officers and employees as agents of the Board for the sale of spirits and low alcohol beverage coolers, manufactured by or for, or blended by such licensee on the licensed premises, at government stores established by the Board (i) on the distiller’s licensed premises or (ii) at the site of an event licensed by the Board and conducted for the purpose of featuring and educating the consuming public about spirits products.Such agents shall sell the spirits and low alcohol beverage coolers in accordance with the provisions of this subtitle, Board regulations, and the terms of the agency agreement between the Authority and the licensed distiller. The Authority shall pay a licensed distiller making sales pursuant to an agreement authorized by this subsection a commission of not less than 20 percent of the retail price of the goods sold. If the licensed distiller makes application and meets certain requirements established by the Board, such agreement shall allow monthly revenue transfers from the licensed distiller to the Board to be submitted electronically and, notwithstanding the provisions of §§

2.2-1802

and

4.1-116

, to be limited to the amount due to the Board in applicable taxes and markups.For the purposes of this subsection, “blended” means the receipt by a licensed distiller of deliveries and shipments of alcoholic beverages, other than wine and beer, in accordance with subdivision A 6 of §

4.1-201

to be (a) (1) additionally aged by the receiving distillery in order to increase the quality and flavor of such alcoholic beverages or (2) used in a low alcohol beverage cooler and (b) bottled by the receiving distillery.

No Class 1 neutral grain spirit or alcohol, as defined by federal regulations, that is without distinctive character, aroma, taste or color shall be sold in government stores at a proof greater than 151 except upon permits issued by the Board for industrial, commercial, culinary, or medical use.

All alcoholic beverages sold in government stores, except for tasting samples pursuant to subsection G sold in government stores established by the Board on a distiller’s licensed premises, shall be in closed containers, sealed and affixed with labels prescribed by the Board.

No alcoholic beverages shall be consumed in a government store by any person unless it is part of an organized tasting event conducted by (i) an employee of a manufacturer of distilled spirits or farm winery or (ii) an authorized representative of a manufacturer of distilled spirits or farm winery with a permit issued by the Board pursuant to subdivision A 14 of §

4.1-212

, at which the samples of alcoholic beverages provided to any consumer do not exceed the limits for spirits or wine set forth in subdivision A 5 of §

4.1-201.1

. No sample may be consumed by any individual to whom alcoholic beverages may not lawfully be sold pursuant to §

4.1-304

.

Notwithstanding the provision of this subsection to the contrary, an agent of the Board appointed pursuant to subsection D may give samples of spirits, beer, wine, or cider to persons to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold for on-premises or off premises consumption, provided that (i) the spirits, beer, wine, or cider samples are manufactured within the same licensed premises or on contiguous premises of such agent licensed as a distillery, brewery, or winery; (ii) no single sample shall exceed four ounces of beer, two ounces of wine or cider, or one-half ounce of spirits, unless served as a mixed beverage, in which case a single sample of spirits may contain up to one and one-half ounces of spirits; (iii) no more than 12 ounces of beer, five ounces of wine, or three ounces of spirits shall be given or sold to any person per day; and (iv) in the case of spirits samples, a method is used to track the consumption of each consumer. Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit such agent from serving samples of spirits as part of a mixed beverage. Such mixed beverage samples may contain spirits or vermouth not manufactured on the licensed premises or on contiguous premises of the licensed distillery, provided that at least 75 percent of the alcohol used in such samples is manufactured on the licensed premises or on contiguous premises of the licensed distillery. An agent of the Board appointed pursuant to subsection D may keep on the licensed premises no more than 10 varieties of spirits or vermouth not manufactured on the licensed premises or on contiguous premises of the licensed distillery. Any spirits or vermouth used in such samples that are not manufactured on the licensed premises or on contiguous premises of the licensed distillery shall be purchased from the Board.

The Board shall establish guidelines governing tasting events conducted pursuant to this subsection.

Any case fee charged to a licensed distiller by the Board for moving spirits from the production and bailment area to the tasting area of a government store established by the Board on the distiller’s licensed premises shall be waived if such spirits are moved by employees of the licensed distiller.

With respect to purchases by licensees at government stores, the Authority shall (i) accept in payment for any purchase or series of purchases cash, electronic fund transfer, credit or debit card, or check payable to the Authority, in the exact amount of any such purchase or series of purchases and (ii) provide notice to licensees on Board policies relating to the assignment of government stores from which licensees may purchase products and any procedure for the licensee to elect to make purchases from an alternative government store.

With respect to purchases by consumers at government stores, the Authority shall accept cash in payment for any purchase or series of purchases. The Board may adopt regulations which provide for accepting a credit card or debit card as payment. Such regulations may provide for the collection, where appropriate, of related fees, penalties, and service charges for the use of a credit card or debit card by any consumer.

Before the Authority implements any increase in the markup on distilled spirits or any change to the markup formula for distilled spirits pursuant to §

4.1-235

that would result in an increase in the retail price of distilled spirits sold to the public, the Authority shall (i) provide at least 45 days’ public notice before such a price increase takes effect; (ii) provide the opportunity for submission of written comments regarding the proposed price increase; (iii) conduct a public meeting for the purpose of receiving verbal comment regarding the proposed price increase; and (iv) consider any written or verbal comments before implementing such a price increase.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-15; 1958, c. 269; 1962, c. 453; 1970, c. 351; 1983, c. 267; 1984, c. 200; 1992, c. 782; 1993, cc. 252, 866; 1996, c. 558; 1999, c. 98; 2005, c. 651; 2006, c. 106; 2007, cc. 546, 726, 820; 2008, c. 609; 2009, c. 620; 2010, cc. 115, 170, 517; 2011, c. 713; 2012, c. 344; 2013, c. 476; 2014, cc. 437, 724; 2015, cc. 38, 62, 604, 730; 2016, cc. 21, 132, 141; 2017, cc. 75, 125, 155, 160; 2018, c. 734; 2019, cc. 37, 178, 466, 810, 811, 814; 2020, cc. 1017, 1113, 1114; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281, 282, 288; .

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 252 amended former § 4-15, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152, the
1993 amendment by c. 252 has been given effect in this section as set out above. In accordance with c. 252, present subsection D was added, and former subsections D through G were redesignated as present subsections E through H.

Acts
2015, cc. 38 and
730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts
2017, cc. 698 and
707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts
2019, cc. 37 and
178, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and third enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2019, c. 814, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 7 provides: “That any farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery that, prior to July 1, 2016, (i) holds a valid license granted by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) in accordance with Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and (ii) is in compliance with the local zoning ordinance as an agricultural district or classification or as otherwise permitted by a locality for farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery use shall be allowed to continue such use as provided in
§

15.2-2307

of the Code of Virginia, notwithstanding (a) the provisions of
§

4.1-206.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (b) a subsequent change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016, whether by transfer, acquisition, inheritance, or other means. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may expand any existing building or structure and the uses thereof so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may construct a new building or structure so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. All such licensees shall comply with the requirements of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and Board regulations for renewal of such license or the issuance of a new license in the event of a change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 8, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That on or after July 1, 2020, the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may issue mixed beverage carrier licenses to persons operating a common carrier of passengers by bus, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages anywhere in the Commonwealth to passengers while in transit aboard any such common carrier. The state license fee for any such license granted prior to January 1, 2022, shall be $190. Such license shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license. For the purposes of this enactment, ‘bus’ means a motor vehicle that (i) is operated by a common carrier licensed under Chapter 20 ( §

46.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 46.2 of the Code of Virginia to transport passengers for compensation over the highways of the Commonwealth on regular or irregular routes of not less than 100 miles, (ii) seats no more than 24 passengers, (iii) is 40 feet in length or longer, (iv) offers wireless Internet services, (v) is equipped with charging stations at every seat for cellular phones or other portable devices, and (vi) during the transportation of passengers, is staffed by an attendant who has satisfied all training requirements set forth in Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia or Board regulation.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and 282, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2022, cc. 78, 79, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2024.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and
282, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) shall convene a work group to study the sale and delivery of mixed beverages and pre-mixed wine for off-premises consumption. In conducting the study, the work group shall analyze the implementation of the provisions of this act that authorize the sale and delivery of mixed beverages and pre-mixed wine for off-premises consumption, determine whether such provisions should be implemented permanently, and identify any further statutory or regulatory modifications that should be made in the event that such provisions are made permanent. The Authority shall report its findings and recommendations to the Chairmen of the House Committee on General Laws and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services by November 1, 2021.”

Acts
2022, c. 583, repealed Acts 2017, c. 155, cl. 2 which provided: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2022.”

The 1999 amendment,

effective March 15, 1999, inserted “credit or debit card” in subsection G.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 651, in subsection G, added clause (ii) and made a related change.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 106, in subsection C, added the exception at the end of the first sentence, and added the last two sentences.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 546 rewrote subsection C [now subsection D], adding the subdivision 1 designation and subdivision C 2 [now subdivision
D 2] and made related changes.

The 2007 amendment by c. 726, in subsection A, in the first sentence, inserted “and products used . . . from time to time” following “mixers” and made a related change; inserted “and other Board-approved products that” following “alcoholic beverages” in the first sentence of subsection B [now subsection C]; and substituted “percent” for “%” twice in the first sentence of subsection C [now subdivision D 1].

The 2007 amendment by c. 820 inserted subsection B and redesignated former subsections B through H as subsections C through I.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 609, effective March 12, 2008, substituted “by or for such licensee on the licensed premises” for “by such licensee” in the introductory paragraph of subsection D.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 620, in subsection D, inserted “or blended by” near the end of the introductory paragraph, inserted “or land in Virginia leased by the licensee” in the first sentence of subdivision D 1 and added the last paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 115 and 170 are identical, and in subsection G, added the language beginning “unless it is part of an organized tasting” in the first sentence and added the last two sentences.

The 2010 amendment by c. 517 inserted subdivision D 3 and made related changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 713 added subdivision D 4 and made related changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 344 added subdivision D 5 and made related changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 476 inserted “except for tasting samples pursuant to subsection G sold in government stores established by the Board on a distiller’s licensed premises” in subsection F.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 437 and 724 are nearly identical and added subdivision D 6. In addition, c. 437 also amended subdivision D 5 by deleting “authentic” preceding “copper” and inserting “or stainless steel.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730, effective January 15, 2018, are identical and added the last sentence in subsection C; substituted “Authority” for “Board” throughout the section and added subsection J.

The 2015 amendment by c. 62 deleted subdivision D 1 through D 6 and made a related change.

The 2015 amendment by c. 604 in subsection G, deleted the third sentence which read: “The Board shall establish guidelines governing tasting events conducted pursuant to this subsection” and added the second and third paragraphs.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 21 inserted “and products licensed by the Virginia Tourism Corporation as specified in §

4.1-103

” and made a related change in subsection A.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 132 and 141 are identical, and in subsection G, substituted “at which” for “and” following “§

4.1-212

” in the first paragraph, and in the second paragraph, twice inserted “spirits” preceding “beer, wine,” inserted “distillery” in clause (i), inserted “unless served as a mixed beverage, in which case a single sample of spirits may contain up to one and one-half ounce of spirits” in clause (ii), inserted “or, in the case of spirits samples, no more than three ounces of spirits” in clause (iii), added clause (iv), and inserted “part of” preceding “a mixed beverage” in the last sentence.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 75 and 125 are identical, and in subsection D, inserted the clause (i) designation, and added clause (ii).

The 2017 amendment by c. 155 expires July 1, 2022, and substituted “proof greater than 151” for “proof greater than 101” in subsection E.

The 2017 amendment by c. 160 inserted “or cider” twice in subsection B and in clause (ii) of the second paragraph in subsection G.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 734 added the third through fifth sentences to the second paragraph of subsection G.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 37 and 178 are identical, effective July 1, 2020, and substituted “provisions” for “requirements” in subsection A.

The 2019 amendment by c. 466, in subsection A, inserted “low alcohol beverage coolers”; in subsection D, inserted “and low alcohol beverage coolers” in the first two paragraphs and in the third paragraph, redesignated clauses (i) and (ii) as (a)(1) and (b), respectively, and added clause (2).

The 2019 amendments by cc. 810 and 811 are identical, and in the second paragraph of subsection D, added the second sentence.

The 2019 amendment by c. 814, effective July 1, 2020, added the third sentence to the second paragraph of subsection D and the third paragraph of subsection G.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1017 rewrote the last sentence of the second paragraph in subsection D, which read: “Monthly revenue transfers from the licensed distiller to the Board (a) may be submitted electronically and through other methods approved by the Board and (b) notwithstanding the provisions of §§

2.2-1802

and

4.1-116

, shall be limited to the amount due to the Board in applicable taxes and markups.”

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114, effective January 1, 2022, are identical, and in subsection G, in clause (ii) of the first paragraph, substituted “subdivision A 14” for “subdivision A 15” and in clause (iii) of the second paragraph, substituted “no more than 12 ounces of beer, five ounces of wine, or” for “no more than four total samples of alcoholic beverage products or, in the case of spirits samples, no more than.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and 282, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in the second paragraph of subsection G, inserted “or off-premises” in the introductory language of the first sentence. For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For comment on federal power to regulate trade under the twenty-first amendment, see 38 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 302 (1981).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10B M.J. Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 27, 28.